Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-446
Sentence; execution.

No court-martial sentence may be executed until approved by the Governor. The Governor shall approve the sentence or such part, amount, or commuted form of the sentence as he sees fit, and may suspend the execution of the sentence or any part of the sentence, as approved by him.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 46, p. 1573.